Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.810

Provision of medical information—Dissemination of requirements and authority.

(1) The department must design, prepare, and make available online, written materials to clearly inform health care providers and staff of the provisions of, and authority to act under, chapter 70.03 RCW.

(2) The department must design, prepare, and make available online, written materials to provide information to providers and patients regarding Washington's death with dignity act, chapter 70.245 RCW.

[ 2020 c 102 s 4.]